New York, session 2025-2026, A11535.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 3 of subdivision (a) of section 1212-a of the tax 2 law, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 (3) a tax, at the same uniform rate, but at a rate not to exceed four 5 and one-half per centum, in multiples of one-half of one per centum, on 6 the receipts from every sale of any or all of the following services in 7 whole or in part: credit rating, credit reporting, credit adjustment and 8 collection services, including, but not limited to, those services 9 provided by mercantile and consumer credit rating or reporting bureaus 10 or agencies and credit adjustment or collection bureaus or agencies, 11 whether rendered in written or oral form or in any other manner, except 12 to the extent otherwise taxable under article twenty-eight of this chap- 13 ter; notwithstanding the foregoing, collection services shall not 14 include those services performed by a law office or a law and collection 15 office, the maintenance or conduct of which constitutes the practice of 16 law, if the services are performed by an attorney at law who has been 17 duly licensed and admitted to practice law in this state. The local law 18 imposing the taxes authorized by this paragraph may provide for exclu- 19 sions and exemptions in addition to those provided for in such para- 20 graph. Provided, however, that the tax hereby authorized shall not be 21 imposed after November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine. 22 § 2. Subsection (a) of section 1301 of the tax law, as amended by 23 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 24 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 25 city in this state having a population of one million or more inhabit- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16029-01-6 A. 11535 2 1 ants, acting through its local legislative body, is hereby authorized 2 and empowered to adopt and amend local laws imposing in any such city, 3 for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred seventy-five: 4 (1) a tax on the personal income of residents of such city, at the 5 rates provided for under subsection (a) of section thirteen hundred four 6 of this article for taxable years beginning before two thousand [twen- 7 ty-seven] thirty, and at the rates provided for under subsection (b) of 8 section thirteen hundred four of this article for taxable years begin- 9 ning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, provided, however, 10 that if, for any taxable year beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] 11 twenty-nine, the rates set forth in such subsection (b) are rendered 12 inapplicable and the rates set forth in such subsection (a) are rendered 13 applicable, then the tax for such taxable year shall be at the rates 14 provided under subparagraphs (A) of paragraphs one, two and three of 15 such subsection (a), 16 (2) for taxable years beginning after nineteen hundred seventy-six, a 17 separate tax on the ordinary income portion of lump sum distributions of 18 such residents, at the rates provided for herein, such taxes to be 19 administered, collected and distributed by the commissioner as provided 20 for in this article. 21 § 3. Subsection (b) of section 1304 of the tax law, as amended by 22 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 23 (b) A tax other than the city separate tax on the ordinary income 24 portion of lump sum distributions imposed pursuant to the authority of 25 section thirteen hundred one of this article shall be determined as 26 follows: 27 (1) Resident married individuals filing joint returns and resident 28 surviving spouses. The tax under this section for each taxable year on 29 the city taxable income of every city resident married individual who 30 makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse 31 under subsection (b) of section thirteen hundred six of this article and 32 on the city taxable income of every city resident surviving spouse shall 33 be determined in accordance with the following table: 34 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 35 nine: 36 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 37 Not over $21,600 1.18% of the city taxable income 38 Over $21,600 but not $255 plus 1.435% of excess 39 over $45,000 over $21,600 40 Over $45,000 but not $591 plus 1.455% of excess 41 over $90,000 over $45,000 42 Over $90,000 $1,245 plus 1.48% of excess 43 over $90,000 44 (2) Resident heads of households. The tax under this section for each 45 taxable year on the city taxable income of every city resident head of a 46 household shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 47 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 48 nine: 49 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 50 Not over $14,400 1.18% of the city taxable income 51 Over $14,400 but not $170 plus 1.435% of excess A. 11535 3 1 over $30,000 over $14,400 2 Over $30,000 but not $394 plus 1.455% of excess 3 over $60,000 over $30,000 4 Over $60,000 $830 plus 1.48% of excess 5 over $60,000 6 (3) Resident unmarried individuals, resident married individuals 7 filing separate returns and resident estates and trusts. The tax under 8 this section for each taxable year on the city taxable income of every 9 city resident individual who is not a city resident married individual 10 who makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's 11 spouse under subsection (b) of section thirteen hundred six of this 12 article or a city resident head of household or a city resident surviv- 13 ing spouse, and on the city taxable income of every city resident estate 14 and trust shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 15 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 16 nine: 17 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 18 Not over $12,000 1.18% of the city taxable income 19 Over $12,000 but not $142 plus 1.435% of excess 20 over $25,000 over $12,000 21 Over $25,000 but not $328 plus 1.455% of excess 22 over $50,000 over $25,000 23 Over $50,000 $692 plus 1.48% of excess 24 over $50,000 25 § 4. Subsection (a) of section 1304-B of the tax law, as amended by 26 chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 27 (a) (1) In addition to any other taxes authorized by this article, any 28 city imposing such taxes is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and 29 amend local laws imposing in any such city for each taxable year begin- 30 ning after nineteen hundred ninety but before two thousand [twenty-sev- 31 en] thirty, an additional tax on the city taxable income of every city 32 resident individual, estate and trust, to be calculated for each taxable 33 year as follows: (i) for each taxable year beginning after nineteen 34 hundred ninety but before nineteen hundred ninety-nine, at the rate of 35 fourteen percent of the sum of the taxes for each such taxable year 36 determined pursuant to section thirteen hundred four and section thir- 37 teen hundred four-A of this article; and (ii) for each taxable year 38 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-eight, at the rate of fourteen 39 percent of the tax for such taxable year determined pursuant to such 40 section thirteen hundred four. 41 (2) Notwithstanding paragraph one of this subsection, for each taxable 42 year beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-nine but before two thou- 43 sand [twenty-seven] thirty, any city imposing such additional tax may by 44 local law impose such tax at a rate that is less than fourteen percent 45 and may impose such tax at more than one rate depending upon the filing 46 status and city taxable income of such city resident individual, estate 47 or trust. 48 (3) A local law enacted pursuant to paragraph two of this subsection 49 shall be applicable with respect to any taxable year only if it has been 50 enacted on or before July thirty-first of such year. A certified copy of 51 such local law shall be mailed by registered mail to the department at 52 its office in Albany within fifteen days of its enactment. However, the 53 department may allow additional time for such certified copy to be A. 11535 4 1 mailed if it deems such action to be consistent with its duties under 2 this article. 3 § 5. Paragraph E of subdivision 1 of section 11-604 of the administra- 4 tive code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws 5 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 6 E. For taxable years beginning on or after January first, nineteen 7 hundred seventy-eight but before January first, two thousand [twenty- 8 seven] thirty, the tax imposed by subdivision one of section 11-603 of 9 this subchapter shall be, in the case of each taxpayer: 10 (a) whichever of the following amounts is the greatest: 11 (1) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 12 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, and for taxable 13 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six, at the rate of eight 14 and eighty-five one-hundredths per centum, of its entire net income or 15 the portion of such entire net income allocated within the city as here- 16 inafter provided, subject to any modification required by paragraphs (d) 17 and (e) of subdivision three of this section, 18 (2) an amount computed at one and one-half mills for each dollar of 19 its total business and investment capital, or the portion thereof allo- 20 cated within the city, as hereinafter provided, except that in the case 21 of a cooperative housing corporation as defined in the internal revenue 22 code, the applicable rate shall be four-tenths of one mill, 23 (3) an amount computed, for taxable years beginning before nineteen 24 hundred eighty-seven, at the rate of nine per centum, and for taxable 25 years beginning after nineteen hundred eighty-six, at the rate of eight 26 and eighty-five one-hundredths per centum, on thirty per centum of the 27 taxpayer's entire net income plus salaries and other compensation paid 28 to the taxpayer's elected or appointed officers and to every stockholder 29 owning in excess of five per centum of its issued capital stock minus 30 fifteen thousand dollars (subject to proration as hereinafter provided) 31 and any net loss for the reported year, or on the portion of any such 32 sum allocated within the city as hereinafter provided for the allocation 33 of entire net income, subject to any modification required by paragraphs 34 (d) and (e) of subdivision three of this section, provided, however, 35 that for taxable years beginning on or after July first, nineteen 36 hundred ninety-six, the provisions of paragraph H of this subdivision 37 shall apply for purposes of the computation under this clause, or 38 (4) for taxable years ending on or before June thirtieth, nineteen 39 hundred eighty-nine, one hundred twenty-five dollars, for taxable years 40 ending after June thirtieth, nineteen hundred eighty-nine and beginning 41 before two thousand nine, three hundred dollars, and for taxable years 42 beginning after two thousand eight: 43 If New York city receipts are: Fixed dollar minimum tax is: 44 Not more than $100,000 $25 45 More than $100,000 but not over $250,000 $75 46 More than $250,000 but not over $500,000 $175 47 More than $500,000 but not over $1,000,000 $500 48 More than $1,000,000 but not over $5,000,000 $1,500 49 More than $5,000,000 but not over $25,000,000 $3,500 50 Over $25,000,000 $5,000 51 For purposes of this clause, New York city receipts are the receipts 52 computed in accordance with subparagraph two of paragraph (a) of subdi- 53 vision three of this section for the taxable year. For taxable years 54 beginning after two thousand eight, if the taxable year is less than 55 twelve months, the amount prescribed by this clause shall be reduced by 56 twenty-five percent if the period for which the taxpayer is subject to A. 11535 5 1 tax is more than six months but not more than nine months and by fifty 2 percent if the period for which the taxpayer is subject to tax is not 3 more than six months. If the taxable year is less than twelve months, 4 the amount of New York city receipts for purposes of this clause is 5 determined by dividing the amount of the receipts for the taxable year 6 by the number of months in the taxable year and multiplying the result 7 by twelve, plus; 8 (b) an amount computed at the rate of three-quarters of a mill for 9 each dollar of the portion of its subsidiary capital allocated within 10 the city as hereinafter provided. 11 In the case of a taxpayer which is not subject to tax for an entire 12 year, the exemption allowed in clause three of subparagraph (a) of this 13 paragraph shall be prorated according to the period such taxpayer was 14 subject to tax. Provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply 15 to taxable years beginning after December thirty-first, two thousand 16 [twenty-six] twenty-nine. For the taxable years specified in the 17 preceding sentence, the tax imposed by subdivision one of section 11-603 18 of this subchapter shall be, in the case of each taxpayer, determined as 19 specified in paragraph A of this subdivision, provided, however, that 20 the provisions of paragraphs G and H of this subdivision shall apply for 21 purposes of the computation under clause three of subparagraph (a) of 22 such paragraph A. 23 § 6. The opening paragraph of section 11-1701 of the administrative 24 code, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read 25 as follows: 26 A tax is hereby imposed on the city taxable income of every city resi- 27 dent individual, estate and trust determined in accordance with the 28 rates set forth in subdivision (a) of this section for taxable years 29 beginning before two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty, and in accordance 30 with the rates set forth in subdivision (b) of this section for taxable 31 years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine. Provided, 32 however, that if, for any taxable year beginning after two thousand 33 [twenty-six] twenty-nine, the rates set forth in such subdivision (b) 34 are rendered inapplicable and the rates set forth in such subdivision 35 (a) are rendered applicable, then the tax for such taxable year shall be 36 at the rates provided under subparagraph (A) of paragraphs one, two and 37 three of such subdivision (a). 38 § 7. Subdivision (b) of section 11-1701 of the administrative code of 39 the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is 40 amended to read as follows: 41 (b) Rate of tax. A tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be 42 determined as follows: 43 (1) Resident married individuals filing joint returns and resident 44 surviving spouses. The tax under this section for each taxable year on 45 the city taxable income of every city resident married individual who 46 makes a single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse 47 under subdivision (b) of section 11-1751 of this title and on the city 48 taxable income of every city resident surviving spouse shall be deter- 49 mined in accordance with the following table: 50 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 51 nine: 52 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 53 Not over $21,600 1.18% of the city taxable income 54 Over $21,600 but not $255 plus 1.435% of excess 55 over $45,000 over $21,600 A. 11535 6 1 Over $45,000 but not $591 plus 1.455% of excess 2 over $90,000 over $45,000 3 Over $90,000 $1,245 plus 1.48% of excess 4 over $90,000 5 (2) Resident heads of households. The tax under this section for each 6 taxable year on the city taxable income of every city resident head of a 7 household shall be determined in accordance with the following table: 8 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 9 nine: 10 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 11 Not over $14,400 1.18% of the city taxable income 12 Over $14,400 but not $170 plus 1.435% of excess 13 over $30,000 over $14,400 14 Over $30,000 but not $394 plus 1.455% of excess 15 over $60,000 over $30,000 16 Over $60,000 $830 plus 1.48% of excess 17 over $60,000 18 (3) Resident unmarried individuals, resident married individuals 19 filing separate returns and resident estates and trusts. The tax under 20 this section for each taxable year on the city taxable income of every 21 city resident individual who is not a married individual who makes a 22 single return jointly with [his or her] such individual's spouse under 23 subdivision (b) of section 11-1751 of this title or a city resident head 24 of a household or a city resident surviving spouse, and on the city 25 taxable income of every city resident estate and trust shall be deter- 26 mined in accordance with the following table: 27 For taxable years beginning after two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 28 nine: 29 If the city taxable income is: The tax is: 30 Not over $12,000 1.18% of the city taxable income 31 Over $12,000 but not $142 plus 1.435% of excess 32 over $25,000 over $12,000 33 Over $25,000 but not $328 plus 1.455% of excess 34 over $50,000 over $25,000 35 Over $50,000 $692 plus 1.48% of excess 36 over $50,000 37 § 8. Paragraph 1 of subdivision (a) of section 11-1704.1 of the admin- 38 istrative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the 39 laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 40 (1) In addition to any other taxes imposed by this chapter, there is 41 hereby imposed for each taxable year beginning after nineteen hundred 42 ninety but before two thousand [twenty-seven] thirty, an additional tax 43 on the city taxable income of every city resident individual, estate and 44 trust, to be calculated for each taxable year as follows: (i) for each 45 taxable year beginning after nineteen hundred ninety but before nineteen 46 hundred ninety-nine, at the rate of fourteen percent of the sum of the 47 taxes for each such taxable year determined pursuant to section 11-1701 48 and section 11-1704 of this subchapter; and (ii) for each taxable year 49 beginning after nineteen hundred ninety-eight, at the rate of fourteen 50 percent of the tax for such taxable year determined pursuant to such 51 section 11-1701. A. 11535 7 1 § 9. Subdivision (a) of section 11-2002 of the administrative code of 2 the city of New York, as amended by chapter 345 of the laws of 2023, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) There are hereby imposed and there shall be paid sales taxes at 5 the rate of four and one-half percent on receipts from every sale of the 6 services of beauty, barbering, hair restoring, manicuring, pedicuring, 7 electrolysis, massage services and similar services, and every sale of 8 services by weight control salons, health salons, gymnasiums, turkish 9 and sauna bath and similar establishments and every charge for the use 10 of such facilities, whether or not any tangible personal property is 11 transferred in conjunction therewith; but excluding services rendered by 12 a physician, osteopath, dentist, nurse, physiotherapist, chiropractor, 13 podiatrist, optometrist, ophthalmic dispenser or a person performing 14 similar services licensed under title eight of the education law, as 15 amended, and excluding such services when performed on pets and other 16 animals, as authorized by subdivision (a) of section twelve hundred 17 twelve-A of the tax law. Provided, however, that the tax hereby imposed 18 shall not be imposed after November thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-six] 19 twenty-nine. 20 § 10. The opening paragraph of subdivision (a) of section 11-2040 of 21 the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 22 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 23 There is hereby imposed within the city and there shall be paid a tax 24 at the rate of four and one-half percent upon the receipts from every 25 sale, except for resale, of the following services, provided, however, 26 that the tax hereby imposed shall not be imposed after November thirti- 27 eth, two thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, on receipts from sales of 28 the services specified in paragraph one of this subdivision: 29 § 11. Section 4 of chapter 877 of the laws of 1975, relating to the 30 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 31 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 32 § 4. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 33 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 34 legislature that the provisions of sections two and three of this act, 35 except with respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax arising 36 thereunder, shall remain in full force and effect only until the date of 37 such expiration, at which time the provisions of law amended by this act 38 shall be continued in full force and effect as they existed prior to the 39 enactment of this act. 40 § 12. Section 6 of chapter 884 of the laws of 1975, relating to the 41 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 42 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 43 § 6. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 44 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 45 legislature that the provisions of sections two, three and four of this 46 act, except with respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax 47 arising thereunder, shall remain in full force and effect only until the 48 date of such expiration, at which time the provisions of law amended by 49 this act shall be continued in full force and effect as they existed 50 prior to the enactment of this act. 51 § 13. Section 2 of chapter 882 of the laws of 1977, relating to the 52 imposition of certain taxes in the city of New York, as amended by chap- 53 ter 345 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 54 § 2. This act shall expire on December 31, [2026] 2029, provided, 55 however, that it is hereby declared to be the express intention of the 56 legislature that the provisions of section one of this act, except with A. 11535 8 1 respect to the enforcement and collection of any tax arising thereunder, 2 shall remain in full force and effect only until the date of such expi- 3 ration, at which time the provisions of law amended by this act shall be 4 continued in full force and effect as they existed prior to the enact- 5 ment of this act. 6 § 14. This act shall take effect immediately.